Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB489.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Arts Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community organization." A nonprofit organization that partners with artists who reside in this Commonwealth with an established goal and purpose to improve their community."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617 "Fund." The Public Arts Fund established under section 4."Program." The Public Arts Grant Program established under section 3.Section 3. Public Arts Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Public Arts Grant Program is established within the department.(b) Powers and duties of department.--The department shall provide grants under the program in accordance with this act to community organizations and artists for the creation of public art that is free and accessible to the public and depicts or benefits historically marginalized communities.Section 4. Public Arts Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Public Arts Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for purposes of the program.Section 5. Applications.(a) Development and availability.--The department shall develop grant application forms and make the forms available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Contents of form.--At a minimum, the grant application form shall contain the following information:(1) The name, address and contact information of the community organization or artist.(2) The amount of grant money requested.(3) A detailed description of the proposed public art installation, including murals, sculptures, statues and temporary public art installations.(4) An explanation of how the proposed public art 20250HB0489PN0478 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 installation will be free to the public and how the public will be able to access the proposed public art installation produced with the grant money.(5) Proof of any permit required by a municipality or permission or permit from another government entity, including a school district or political subdivision.(6) A timeline of the proposed public art installation, including a proposed completion date.(7) Other information the department deems necessary and appropriate.(c) Compliance.--The department shall determine whether a grant application complies with all requirements under section 6 and provide the determination in writing to the person that submitted the application.Section 6. Requirements.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall:(1) Award grants to eligible community organizations and artists that have been approved by the department.(2) Award grants only to community organizations' headquarters in this Commonwealth.(b) Time period for completion.--(1) The community organization or artist that is awarded a grant shall complete the public art installations within three years of the award of the grant.(2) If a proposed public art installation is not completed within three years, the department may take action to recover the awarded grant.(3) The department may grant a one-year extension to a proposed art installation if the project experienced delays not the fault of the community organization or artist.20250HB0489PN0478 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Administration.The department shall develop guidelines for the implementation of the program.Section 8. Award of grants.A grant amount may not exceed a maximum of $100,000 for the community organization or artist approved by the department.Section 9. Interfund transfer.Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, the sum of $10,000,000 shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Public Arts Fund.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0489PN0478 - 4 - 123456789101112